Washington statutes.
RCW 16.52.305

Unlawful use of hook—Gross misdemeanor.

(1) A person is guilty of the unlawful use of a hook if the person utilizes, or attempts to use, a hook with the intent to pierce the flesh or mouth of a bird or mammal.

(2) Unlawful use of a hook is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2004 c 220 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 220: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 29, 2004]." [ 2004 c 220 s 2.]